Hawaii, session 2025, SB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to propose an amendment to article I of the Hawaii State Constitution to establish the right of each person to own and have an exclusive property right in the data they generate on the Internet. SECTION 2. Article I of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "RIGHT TO OWN ONE'S OWN DATA Section     . Each person shall own and have an exclusive property right in the data that that person generates on a public networked information system such as the Internet.  The legislature shall determine which data are subject to this provision and the manner in which this provision shall be implemented and enforced." SECTION 3. The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall the constitution guarantee the right of each person to own and have an exclusive property right in the data that person generates on the Internet?" SECTION 4. New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 5. This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________